Wisconsin, session 2025, SB730.
do enact as follows:SB730,11Section 1. 165.85 (3) (cm) of the statutes is renumbered 165.85 (3m) (am), 2and 165.85 (3m) (am) (intro.), 1. and 2., as renumbered, are amended to read:SB730,2,63165.85 (3m) (am) (intro.) Decertify Within 30 days after the relevant event, 4decertify law enforcement officers, tribal law enforcement officers, tactical 5emergency medical services professionals, jail officers, or juvenile detention officers 6who do any of the following:SB730,2,971. Resign employment in lieu of termination or are terminated for just cause 8under any applicable provision of law, unless the board determines under sub. (3m) 9(c) that decertification on this ground is not necessary.SB730,3,212. Violate or fail to comply with a rule, policy, or order of the board relating to 2curriculum, training, or recruitment or violate or fail to comply with s. 175.44.SB730,23Section 2. 165.85 (3m) (am) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:SB730,3,114165.85 (3m) (am) 1m. Terminate employment while under investigation for 5an alleged act of official misconduct. An officer decertified under this subdivision 6may not be certified in the future unless the officer is granted a waiver either by the 7police commission or police and fire commission, if applicable, of the jurisdiction in 8which the officer seeks employment and corresponding recertification or by the 9governing body, as defined in s. 66.0309 (1) (a), of the city, village, town, or county of 10the jurisdiction in which the officer seeks employment and corresponding 11recertification.SB730,312Section 3. 165.85 (3m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB730,3,1713165.85 (3m) (c) Establish procedures for decertification under sub. (3) (cm) 14par. (am) in compliance with ch. 227, except that decertification for an action 15described under sub. (3) (cm) par. (am) 8. shall be done as provided under par. (a). 16The procedures shall include a process for reviewing a resignation in lieu of 17termination or a termination for just cause.SB730,418Section 4. 165.85 (4) (c) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB730,3,2219165.85 (4) (c) 7. Any person employed and certified as a jail officer on July 1, 201994, is certified as a juvenile detention officer and remains certified as a juvenile 21detention officer subject to annual recertification requirements under subd. 6. and 22the board’s decertification authority requirements under sub. (3) (cm) (3m) (am).SB730,523Section 5. 165.85 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB730,4,31165.85 (4m) Best practices. The board shall develop, and review at least 2once every 2 years, a model use of force policy for law enforcement agencies to use in 3addition to complying with s. 175.44 that does all of the following:SB730,4,54(a) Addresses interactions with individuals with mental disorders, alcohol or 5drug problems, dementia disorders, and developmental disabilities.SB730,4,86(b) Limits the use of force against vulnerable populations, including children, 7elderly individuals, pregnant women, individuals with physical or mental 8disabilities, and individuals with limited English proficiency.SB730,4,99(c) Includes other best practices that the board identifies.SB730,610Section 6. 175.44 (2) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB730,4,1711175.44 (2) (b) Use of force. (intro.) When using force, a law enforcement 12officer is required to act in good faith to achieve a legitimate law enforcement 13objective. A law enforcement officer shall use skills and tactics, including de-14escalation tactics, that minimize the likelihood that force will become necessary. A 15law enforcement officer is authorized to use force that is the least amount of force 16necessary to address a threat safely and that is objectively reasonable based on the 17totality of the circumstances, including:SB730,718Section 7. Initial applicability.SB730,4,2119(1) Mandatory decertification. The treatment of s. 165.85 (3) (cm) and 20(3m) (am) 1m. first applies to events that occur on the effective date of this 21subsection.SB730,4,2222